Wyoming, session 2025, HB0179.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The department of health, in consultation with
the board of land commissioners and the office of state
lands and investments, is authorized and directed to convey
its right, title and interest in the surface estate of the
following described parcel of land in Fremont county,
containing twenty-eight and ninety-four hundredths (28.94)
HB0179

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0619
acres, more or less, held for the Wyoming state training
school, to the Wyoming department of transportation: a
parcel of land located in section 17, township 33 north,
range 99 west, sixth principal meridian, Fremont county,
Wyoming, described more particularly as follows: begin at
an iron rod marking the southeasterly corner of Leda
enterprise park, as per plat thereof recorded in plat book
8, page 193, in the public records of Fremont county;
thence north 00 degrees, 03 minutes, 48 seconds west
(bearing basis), along the easterly boundary of said
subdivision, for a distance of 292.53 feet to an iron rod;
thence north 70 degrees, 00 minutes, 00 seconds east, along
said easterly boundary, for a distance of 312.59 feet to an
iron rod; thence, north 05 degrees, 00 minutes, 00 seconds
west, along said easterly boundary, for a distance of
486.41 feet to the southerly right-of-way line of
Enterprise boulevard; thence, south 78 degrees, 51 minutes,
23 seconds east, along said right-of-way line for a
distance of 184.68 feet to a point, said point being on a
circular curve concave to the north; thence,
counterclockwise to the left, along the arc of said curve,
having a radius of 90.56 feet, for an arc distance of
207.14 feet, chord bearing and chord distance of south 68
HB0179

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0619
degrees, 10 minutes, 24 seconds east, 164.84 feet, to the
end of said curve; thence, north 36 degrees, 19 minutes, 29
seconds east, for a distance of 708.32 feet to the north
line of section 17; thence, north 88 degrees, 58 minutes,
31 seconds east along the north line of said section for a
distance of 26.13 feet; thence, departing said section
line, south 45 degrees, 44 minutes, 42 seconds east, for a
distance of 257.40 feet; thence, north 43 degrees, 46
minutes, 16 seconds east, for a distance of 257.74 feet to
the north line of said section; thence, north 88 degrees,
58 minutes, 31 seconds east, along the section line, for a
distance of 262.94 feet; thence, south 22 degrees, 03
minutes, 52 seconds west, for a distance of 1448.41 feet;
thence, south 88 degrees, 36 minutes, 52 seconds west, for
a distance of 1112.35 feet to the point of beginning.

(b) The conveyance authorized in this section shall
be made without impacting other rights or estates
associated with the parcel or the portion thereof to be
conveyed under this section and subject to easements,
setbacks and restrictions of record. The remainder of the
parcel located at section 17, township 33 north, range 99
west, sixth principal meridian, Fremont county, Wyoming
HB0179

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0619
that is not conveyed in this act shall be retained by the
department of health for future conveyance to a
municipality to be used for residential housing.

(c) The conveyance authorized under this section
shall be made without cost, except all costs associated
with any necessary survey, title insurance and closing
shall be paid by the department of transportation.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0179